Mississippi, session 2026, HB1819.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the governing authorities for the City of Laurel, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with refurbishing projects on three (3) streets and providing a walking track and splash pad, as provided in Section 2 of this act, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027............ $ 13,850,000.00 SECTION 2.  The funds appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be expended for the following purposes: (a)  Refurbishing 6th Street from 8th Avenue to 16th Avenue $ 6,500,000.00 (b)  Refurbishing 6th Avenue from 5th Street to 13th Street $ 3,500,000.00 (c)  Refurbishing 8th Avenue from 5th Street to 13th Street $ 3,500,000.00 (d)  Providing a walking track and splash pad in Ward 4 ................................................... $ 350,000.00 TOTAL........................................... $ 13,850,000.00 SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.